District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.12

Action without meeting.

(a)

Unless prohibited by the organic rules, any action that may be taken by a board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents in a record to the action.

(b)

Consent under subsection (a) of this section may be withdrawn by a director in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives consent from all directors.

(c)

A record of consent for any action under subsection (a) of this section may specify the effective date or time of the action.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 812 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition